Louisiana, session 2026, SB327.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:273.3(B)(1) and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted and to R.S.
17:273.3(B)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§273.3. Foreign language immersion programs; creation by local school boards;
parent petition; French immersion
* * *
B. The legislature finds that:
(1) Research indicates that students who participate in foreign language
immersion programs, particularly in French immersion programs, demonstrate
greater levels of proficiency in the English language, higher overall academic
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-542 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 327
achievement, and higher levels of self-esteem.
* * *
(4) In Louisiana, French language development and French language
immersion programs, in particular, provide a better understanding of the state's social
traditions and serve to promote, preserve, and develop our unique bilingual culture,
tradition, and history.
(5) In reflecting its unique bilingual culture, tradition and history,
Louisiana has adopted as its official state book the Holy Bible, published by
Johannes Prevel (Prevel, Jean, active 1510-1528, printer. & Petit, Jean, fl. 1492-
1530.) in the French language, and is the oldest edition of the Holy Bible in the
Louisiana State Museum system.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 49:170.26 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§170.26. State book; the Holy Bible printed in French
A. The legislature does hereby recognize and acknowledge the following:
(1) That the state motto as found in the state pledge of allegiance: "A
state, under God, united in purpose and ideals, confident that justice shall
prevail for all of those abiding here."
(2) That Louisiana's vibrant culture is largely influenced by our French
history.
(3) That in the year 1682 A.D., French explorer Rene'-Robert Cavalier,
Sieur de laSalle, erected a cross near the mouth of the Mississippi River to claim
the whole of the basin, naming it "La Louisiane".
B. There shall be an official state book. The official state book shall be
the Holy Bible, published by Johannes Prevel (Prevel, Jean, active 1510-1528,
printer. & Petit, Jean, fl. 1492-1530.) in the French language and is the oldest
edition of the Holy Bible in the Louisiana State Museum system.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-542 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 327